Utah statutes.
67-19-12.2.   Education benefit plan for law enforcement and correctional
officers.
(1)  As used in this section, "law enforcement officer" has the same meaning
as in Section 53-13-103 and "correctional officer" has the same meaning as in
Section 53-13-104.
(2)  The executive director shall establish a plan authorizing any agency to
implement an educational compensation program for law enforcement officers and
correctional officers employed by that agency.
(3)  The program shall provide that in order for a law enforcement officer or
correctional officer to qualify for education benefits for college or
university education, the law enforcement officer or correctional officer
shall:
(a)  provide a certified transcript of grades, demonstrating a grade point
average of 3.0 or greater, from an accredited college or university; and
(b)  have successfully completed the probationary employment period with the
employing agency.
(4)  The program shall also provide that the agency may consider a law
enforcement officer or correctional officer to receive additional compensation
as follows for higher education degrees earned on or after April 30, 2001, in
a subject area directly related to the law enforcement officer's or
correctional officer's employment with the agency:
(a)  two steps for an associate's degree;
(b)  two steps for a bachelor's degree; and
(c)  two steps for a master's degree.
(5)  Expenses incurred by an agency to provide additional compensation under
this section may be only from the agency's existing budget.
